Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.020

System created—Administration.

A state employees' retirement system is hereby created for the employees of the state of Washington and its political subdivisions. The administration and management of the retirement system, the responsibility for making effective the provisions of this chapter, and the authority to make all rules and regulations necessary therefor are hereby vested in the department. All such rules and regulations shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended. The retirement system herein provided for shall be known as the Washington Public Employees' Retirement System.

[ 1991 c 35 s 71; 1969 c 128 s 2; 1967 c 127 s 1; 1949 c 240 s 2; 1947 c 274 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Severability—1969 c 128: See note following RCW 41.40.010.